Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2385.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7715. Minors serving in volunteer emergency service organizations.(a) Limitations of minors.--(1) An individual who is 14 years of age or older who is a member of a volunteer emergency service organization may participate in training and emergency service activities except as follows:(i) A minor may not operate a truck, ambulance or other official fire vehicle.(ii) A minor may not operate an aerial ladder, 12345678910111213141516171819 aerial platform or hydraulic jack.(iii) A minor may not use rubber electrical gloves, insulated wire gloves, insulated wire cutters, life nets or acetylene cutting units.(iv) A minor may not operate the pump of a fire vehicle while at the scene of a fire.(v) A minor may not enter a burning structure under any circumstance except when engaged in a training session for an interior firefighting module with live burns and all of the following apply:(A) The minor is 17 years of age or older.(B) The minor has permission to engage in the training from a fire chief and a parent or guardian of the minor.(C) The minor is under the supervision of a credentialed Pennsylvania State Fire Academy instructor.(vi) A minor may not engage in firefighting activities unless all of the following apply:(A) The minor is 16 years of age or older.(B) The minor has successfully completed a course of training equal to the standards for basic firefighting established by the State Fire Commissioner.(C) The minor is under the direct supervision and control of the fire chief, an experienced line officer or a designated forest fire warden.(2) In addition to the limitations under paragraph (1), the activities of individuals over 13 years of age and under 16 years of age shall be further limited as follows:20260HB2385PN3199 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) An individual who is over 13 years of age and under 16 years of age shall only be permitted to perform the following activities:(A) Training.(B) First aid.(C) Cleanup service at the scene of a fire, outside the structure and after the fire has been declared by the fire official in charge to be under control.(D) Serving food and beverages.(ii) An individual who is over 13 years of age and under 16 years of age may not do any of the following:(A) Operate high pressure hose lines except during training activities. A high pressure hose line is any water hose used for fire suppression with a pressure greater than 150 psi, any air hose with a pressure greater than 100 psi and any hydraulic hose used for rescue tools with a pressure greater than 1,000 psi.(B) Ascend ladders except during training activities.(b) Authority of State Fire Commissioner.--(1) The State Fire Commissioner, in consultation with the State Fire Advisory Board, may prohibit other activities that the State Fire Commissioner deems hazardous to the health of minors through regulation.(2) Until modified or deleted by the State Fire Commissioner, 34 Pa. Code § 11.67 (relating to training and firefighting) shall be deemed regulations of the State Fire Commissioner under this subsection.20260HB2385PN3199 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Restrictions on activities of minors.--(1) Except as provided for under this subsection, this section does not supersede any other provision of this title or any regulation promulgated under this title.(2) A minor may continue serving in answer to a fire call until excused by the individual acting as chief of the fire company if the minor:(i) is 16 years of age or older;(ii) is a member of a volunteer fire company; and(iii) answers a fire call while lawfully employed.(3) An individual who is 14 or 15 years of age may engage in training or firefighting activities permitted under this section until 10 p.m. before a school day if the minor:(i) is a member of a volunteer fire company; and(ii) has the written consent of the minor's parent or legal guardian.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Minor." An individual under 18 years of age."Volunteer emergency service organization." A volunteer fire company, volunteer ambulance organization, volunteer rescue organization, volunteer forest firefighting organization or volunteer organization of emergency service personnel who are expected to respond to medical emergencies or large-scale disasters.Section 2. Section 8112.1(a)(3) introductory paragraph of Title 35 is amended to read:§ 8112.1. Scholarships for recruitment, training and retention.(a) Utilization.--Except as provided under subsection (d), 20260HB2385PN3199 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 money transferred under 3 Pa.C.S. § 1113(a)(4) (relating to disposition of certain funds) shall be utilized by the department's Bureau of Emergency Medical Services to:* * *(3) Make available a pilot program for high school students with instruction through partnerships between institutions of higher education in this Commonwealth and school entities or nonpublic schools, or both, to increase the number of individuals capable of becoming EMS providers. The pilot program shall be conducted in accordance with [section 7 of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act.] section 7715 (relating to minors serving in volunteer emergency service organizations). The following shall apply:* * *Section 3. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of 35 Pa.C.S. § 7715.(2) The definition of "volunteer emergency service organization" in section 2 and section 7 of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act, are repealed.Section 4. The addition of 35 Pa.C.S. § 7715 is a continuation of section 7 of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act. The following apply:(1) Except as otherwise provided in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7715, all activities initiated under section 7 of the Child Labor Act shall continue and remain in full force and effect and 20260HB2385PN3199 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may be completed under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7715. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made under section 7 of the Child Labor Act and which are in effect on the effective date of section 3 of this act shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7715. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under section 7 of the Child Labor Act are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of section 7 of the Child Labor Act.(2) Except as set forth in paragraph (3), any difference in language between 35 Pa.C.S. § 7715 and section 7 of the Child Labor Act is intended only to conform to the style of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes and is not intended to change or affect the legislative intent, judicial construction or administration and implementation of section 7 of the Child Labor Act.(3) Paragraph (2) does not apply to the addition of 35 Pa.C.S. § 7715(b) and (d).Section 5. This act shall take effect in one year.20260HB2385PN3199 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819